Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Chapter 62. Certificates of Fitness.

Administrative Code. —

For certificates of fitness, see 8 AAC, part 8.

Sec. 18.62.010.
Certificate of fitness required.

In connection with work performed subject to the standards established in AS

18.60.580

and AS

18.60.705

, a person may not be employed without a certificate of fitness to perform the work, except that a certificate of fitness may not be required of employees of an electric utility that does not have within its service area any portion of a city or unified municipality having more than 2,500 population.

History.

(§ 1 ch 12 SLA 1974; am § 1 ch 62 SLA 1980)

Administrative Code. —

For holder in possession and application for certificate of fitness, see 8 AAC 90, art. 1.

For right of inspection, see 8 AAC 90, art. 7.

Opinions of attorney general. —

A state employee who engages in installation of new electrical systems or performs alteration of existing systems must have a certificate of fitness, but a state employee who performs only routine maintenance and replacement of burned out or damaged items on state property need not have a certificate. September 23, 1982 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 18.62.020.
Application for and issuance of certificate.

The department shall issue certificates of fitness and renewal certificates of fitness valid for two years. The certificate may be issued only to an individual. An applicant for a certificate shall apply in writing, under oath, on a form prescribed by the department containing

the name and address of the applicant;

the applicant’s age;

the applicant’s citizenship; and

other information relevant to licensing that the department requires.

History.

(§ 1 ch 12 SLA 1974; am § 5 ch 81 SLA 1984; am § 48 ch 63 SLA 1993)

Revisor’s notes. —

The “department” referred to in this section and throughout AS 18.62 is the Department of Labor [now Department of Labor and Workforce Development]. Chapter 12, SLA 1974 (SB 255 am H) did not enact a definition for AS 18.62, but the bill’s title stated that it provided “for the issuance of certificates of fitness by the Department of Labor [now Department of Labor and Workforce Development].”

Administrative Code. —

For holder in possession and application for certificate of fitness, see 8 AAC 90, art. 1.

For continuing education, see 8 AAC 90, art. 5.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Electrical and mechanical administrators who are employees of the state of Alaska or other governmental agencies are exempt from the requirements of AS

08.40.090

regarding electrical administrators and of AS

08.40.260

regarding mechanical administrators. We believe this interpretation to be the most persuasive in light of precedent, reason, and policy. Guin v. Ha, 591 P.2d 1281 (Alaska 1979).2002 Op. Att'y Gen. 21.

Sec. 18.62.030.
Fees.

An applicant shall pay a nonrefundable application and examination fee of $50 when applying for a trainee or journeyman level certificate of fitness. The department shall charge a biennial fee of $200 for the issuance of a trainee or journeyman level certificate or a renewal certificate, to be prorated if issued for less than two years, and a fee of $25 for the issuance of a duplicate certificate.

Fees collected under (a) of this section shall be deposited into the building safety account created under AS

44.31.025

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 12 SLA 1974; am § 6 ch 81 SLA 1984; am § 37 ch 138 SLA 1986; am § 7 ch 90 SLA 1991; am § 49 ch 63 SLA 1993; am § 3 ch 96 SLA 2002; am § 3 ch 87 SLA 2004)

Administrative Code. —

For plumber certificate of fitness, see 8 AAC 90, art. 2.

For electrician certificate of fitness, see 8 AAC 90, art. 3.

For renewal and cancellation of electrical and plumbing certificate of fitness, see 8 AAC 90, art. 4.

For continuing education, see 8 AAC 90, art. 5.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 87, SLA 2004 (SB 278), amending subsection (a) of this section, see 2004 Senate Journal 1993 - 1994.

Sec. 18.62.040.
Cancellation and duration of certificate.

The department may cancel a certificate for cause.
A certificate, if not cancelled for cause, is valid for the term it was issued for. A certificate holder whose certificate is about to expire may apply for a new certificate.

History.

(§ 1 ch 12 SLA 1974; am § 7 ch 81 SLA 1984)

Administrative Code. —

For renewal and cancellation of electrical and plumbing certificate of fitness, see 8 AAC 90, art. 4.

Sec. 18.62.050.
Issuance and contents of certificate.

If, upon investigation and examination by the department, the applicant is found competent by reason of training and experience, the department shall issue a certificate of fitness. The certificate shall set out the competency of the applicant and provide for positive identification of the applicant, and shall be carried on the person engaged in work subject to the requirement of a certificate of fitness under this chapter.

[Repealed, § 23 ch 81 SLA 1984.]

Verification by an Alaska-based labor union of a member’s qualification to meet the requirements for a certificate of fitness may be accepted in lieu of examination or other requirement for issuing a certification under this chapter.

Except for a plumber utility trainee level certificate of fitness, the department may not issue a trainee level certificate of fitness under (a) of this section unless the applicant is indentured in an apprenticeship program registered with the United States Department of Labor, Office of Apprenticeship, or a state apprenticeship agency recognized by the United States Department of Labor, Office of Apprenticeship.

History.

(§ 1 ch 12 SLA 1974; am § 23 ch 81 SLA 1984; am § 1 ch 26 SLA 2020)

Administrative Code. —

For holder in possession and application for certificate of fitness, see 8 AAC 90, art. 1.

For plumber certificate of fitness, see 8 AAC 90, art. 2.

For electrician certificate of fitness, see 8 AAC 90, art. 3.

For continuing education, see 8 AAC 90, art. 5.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2020 amendment, effective July 29, 2020, added (d).

Editor's notes. —

Section 2,
ch. 26, SLA 2020, provides that the enactment of (d) of this section “applies to applications for a trainee level certificate of fitness submitted on or after July 29, 2020.”

Sec. 18.62.060.
Power of the department.

The department shall issue orders and adopt regulations necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 12 SLA 1974; am § 8 ch 81 SLA 1984)

Administrative Code. —

For holder in possession and application for certificate of fitness, see 8 AAC 90, art. 1.

For plumber certificate of fitness, see 8 AAC 90, art. 2.

For electrician certificate of fitness, see 8 AAC 90, art. 3.

For renewal and cancellation of electrical and plumbing certificate of fitness, see 8 AAC 90, art. 4.

For continuing education, see 8 AAC 90, art. 5.

For right of inspection, see 8 AAC 90, art. 7.

Sec. 18.62.070.
Persons required to obtain certificate.

A person engaged in one of the following trades shall first obtain from the department the appropriate certificate of fitness in that trade:

electrical wiring subject to the standards established in AS

18.60.580

; and

plumbing subject to the uniform plumbing code; in this paragraph, “uniform plumbing code” means the minimum plumbing code adopted for the state under AS

18.60.705

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 12 SLA 1974; am § 4 ch 29 SLA 1991; am § 5 ch 2 SLA 1996)

Administrative Code. —

For holder in possession and application for certificate of fitness, see 8 AAC 90, art. 1.

For plumber certificate of fitness, see 8 AAC 90, art. 2.

For electrician certificate of fitness, see 8 AAC 90, art. 3.

For renewal and cancellation of electrical and plumbing certificate of fitness, see 8 AAC 90, art. 4.

For continuing education, see 8 AAC 90, art. 5.

For right of inspection, see 8 AAC 90, art. 7.

Sec. 18.62.080.
Penalty.

A person, either an employer or employee, who violates a provision of this chapter or of a regulation adopted under this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, is punishable by a fine of not more than $500.

History.

(§ 1 ch 12 SLA 1974)

Administrative Code. —

For right of inspection, see 8 AAC 90, art. 7.